District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0478.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Renter’s Tax Credit Expansion Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-1806.06 of the of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1)(A) Homeowners. For purposes of providing relief to certain District of
Columbia residents who own their principal place of residence and who reside in the same, an
income tax credit shall be allowed to the eligible claimant equal to the amount by which all or a
portion of real property taxes the taxpayer pays on his or her principal place of residence for the
taxable year exceeds a percentage (as determined under paragraph (2) of this subsection) of his


or her household gross income for that year. The credit shall not exceed the maximum credit
amount.
“(1)(B) Renters. District of Columbia residents who rent their principal place of
residence, who reside in the same and who are eligible claimants under the provisions of this
section, shall be allowed an income tax credit equal to the amount by which rent paid
constituting property taxes, deemed for the purposes of this subsection to be 20% of rent, on his
or her principal place of residence for the taxable year, exceeds a percentage (as determined
under paragraph (2) of this subsection) of his or her household gross income for that year and
which exceeds the amount of any rental supplement payments, received by the claimant pursuant
to the provisions of title III of the Rental Housing Act of 1977, during that year. The credit shall
not exceed the maximum credit amount.”.
(b) A new subsection (a-1) is added to read as follows:
“(a-1) For taxable years beginning after January 1, 2026:
“(1)(A) If the amount of the Renter’s Tax Credit, as established in subsection
(a)(1)(B) of this section, allowed is at least $1,200, the individual may elect, in the manner and
form prescribed by the Chief Financial Officer, whether the entire amount of the Renter's Tax
Credit allowed shall be paid to the individual in either 12 equal monthly payments or one lump
sum payment; or
“(B) If the amount of the Renter’s Tax Credit allowed is less than $1,200,
the entire amount of the Renter’s Tax Credit allowed shall be paid to the individual in one lump
sum payment.
“(2) No interest shall be allowed on any refund payments made under this
subsection.


“(3) A lump sum payment or a periodic payment made pursuant to this
subsection shall not be considered income for the purpose of determining eligibility or benefit
amount for public assistance.”.
(c) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4) The term “claimant” means a person who has filed a claim under this section
and who was an owner of record of a home in the District or a lessee, tenant at will, or tenant at
sufferance paying rent on a home in the District, during the entire calendar year preceding the
year in which the person files a claim for relief under this section; provided that, an otherwise
eligible claimant who lacks a fixed address, resides in a temporary or transitional shelter, or pays
for a hotel, motel, or other accommodation within the District as a primary place of residence
shall be deemed a renter for the purposes of this section. Only one claimant per tax filing unit per
year shall be entitled to relief under this section.”.
(2) Paragraph (13) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (D) to read as
follows:
“(D) For the taxable year beginning January 1, 2026, 60 percent area
median income, based on the claimant’s household size, as defined in § 42-2801(1)(A) for
eligible claimants of the renter tax credit established under subsection (a)(1)(B) of this section.”.
(3) Paragraph (14) is amended by adding a new subparagraph (D) to read as
follows:
“(D) For the taxable year beginning January 1, 2026, the greater of the
Efficiency of Small Area Fair Market Rent (“SAFMR”) for the claimant’s ZIP Code, as
published by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, or the median Efficiency


of SAFMR for the District of Columbia.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.